Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 13

Prohibited Acts

45-3-1301. Unauthorized conduct of savings and loan business.

It is unlawful for any person not authorized pursuant to this chapter, directly or indirectly, to carry on a savings and loan business within this state, or falsely and with intent to defraud, to act as a savings and loan association, or to represent that the person is acting for an association, or to use an artificial or corporate name that is the name of an existing association.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.05; T.C.A., § 45-1705; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 5, 8.

45-3-1302. Receipt of deposits while in an impaired condition.

It is unlawful for an association, directly or indirectly, to receive any deposit while in an impaired condition, except with the express written consent of the commissioner, or for an officer, director, agent, or employee of an association who knows, or in the proper performance of the person's duties should know, of the impaired condition, directly or indirectly, to receive or authorize the receipt of the deposits.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.06; T.C.A., § 45-1706; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1303. Unlawful concealment of transactions.

It is unlawful for a director, officer, agent, or employee of an association, directly or indirectly, to conceal or endeavor to conceal any transaction of the association from any officer, director, agent, or employee of the association or from the commissioner, any examiner, or other employee of the department to whom it should properly be disclosed.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.07; T.C.A., § 45-1707; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1304. Improper maintenance of accounts — False or deceptive entries and statements.

It is unlawful for any director, officer, agent, or employee of an association, directly or indirectly, to:

Maintenance of Accounts. Maintain or authorize the maintenance of any account of the association in a manner that, to the person's knowledge, does not conform to the requirements prescribed by this chapter;

False Entries, etc. With intent to deceive, make any false or misleading statement or entry or omit any statement or entry that should be made in any book, account, report, or statement of the association; or

Obstruction of Examination. Obstruct or endeavor to obstruct a lawful examination of the association by the commissioner, an examiner, or other employee of the department.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.08; T.C.A., § 45-1708.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1305. Unlawful payments of penalties and judgments.

Except as otherwise expressly permitted by this chapter, it is a Class B misdemeanor for an association, directly or indirectly, to pay a fine or penalty imposed by law upon any other person or any judgment against the person, or to reimburse, directly or indirectly, any person by whom the fine, penalty, or judgment has been paid, except in settlement of its own liability or in connection with the acquisition of property against which the judgment is a lien.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.09; T.C.A., § 45-1709.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1306. False reports.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any official, examiner, or other employee of the department to knowingly and willingly make on oath a false report as to the result of any examination.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.10; T.C.A., § 45-1710.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1307. False swearing.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person to willfully and knowingly swear or affirm falsely when being examined under oath by any examiner or by the commissioner, or a hearing examiner in regard to any matter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.11; T.C.A., § 45-1711.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1308. Unlawful disclosure of information.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any official, examiner, or other employee of the department to disclose any information concerning an association or any director, officer, agent, or of the association, obtained in the course or as a result of the performance of official duties, other than disclosure that is required by this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.12; T.C.A., § 45-1712.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Confidential records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1309. Director acting to detriment of association.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any director of an association to concur in any vote or act of the directors of the association if the director knows or has reason to know that the vote or act is intended to:

Place the association in an impaired condition;

Cause the association to pay dividends on its outstanding capital stock in violation of law;

Cause a reduction of the capital stock of an association in violation of law;

Cause the association to receive or discount any note or other evidence of debt in payment of capital stock required to be paid; or

Apply any of the funds of the association, except as permitted by law, directly or indirectly, to the purchase of shares of its own capital stock.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.13; T.C.A., § 45-1713.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1310. Appropriation of property and false entries.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any officer, director, agent, or employee of an association to, directly or indirectly:

Knowingly, or with intent to defraud, receive or possess any of its property otherwise than in payment of a just demand, and omit to make, or cause the omission of, a full and true entry thereof in the books and accounts of the association;

Knowingly concur in the omission of any material entry in its books or accounts; or

Knowingly cause to be published a false representation that the association is in a better financial condition than it actually is.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.14; T.C.A., § 45-1714.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1311. Defamation of business reputation.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person to knowingly make, utter, circulate, or transmit to any other person or persons, any statement untrue in fact, derogatory to the financial condition of any association subject to this chapter, or any federal association in this state, with intent to injure the financial institution, or who shall counsel, aid, procure, or induce another to originate, make, utter, transmit, or circulate the untrue statement, with like intent.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.15; T.C.A., § 45-1715.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-3-1312. Commissioner to submit violations to district attorney general.

The commissioner shall submit to the district attorneys general for the respective counties of this state any criminal violation of any provisions of this chapter known by the commissioner to have occurred in the county.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.16; modified; T.C.A., § 45-1716.

45-3-1313. Criminal sanctions for violations.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, any person responsible for an act or omission expressly declared to be a criminal offense by any provision of this chapter commits:

A Class C misdemeanor; or

If the act or omission was intended to defraud, a Class E felony.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of an association is deemed responsible for an act or omission of the association declared by this chapter to be a criminal offense whenever, knowing that the act or omission is unlawful, the director, officer, agent or employee participates in authorizing, executing, ratifying or concealing the act or omission.

Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, it is no defense to a criminal prosecution under this chapter that the defendant did not know the facts establishing the criminal character of the act or omission charged if the defendant reasonably could and should have known the facts in the proper performance of the defendant's duties.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.17; T.C.A., § 45-1717; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 39, 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor and Class E felony, §40-35-111.

45-3-1314. Injunction.

Whenever a violation of any provision of this chapter by any association or any director, officer, agent, or employee of the association is threatened or impending such that immediate and substantial injury to the association or to its depositors or stockholders will ensue, a court of competent jurisdiction shall, upon suit of the commissioner, issue an injunction restraining the violation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.18; T.C.A., § 45-1718.